Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 5 Planning and Zoning

Cross references. —

As to county surveyors, see §§

18-3-701

to

18-3-705

.

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

As to municipal and county airports generally, see §

10-5-101

et seq.

For the Wyoming Conservation Districts Law, see §§

11-16-101

to

11-16-134

.

As to municipal zoning generally, see §§

15-1-601

to

15-1-611

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 155 to 167, 189 to 198, 541 to 548; 82 Am. Jur. 2d Zoning and Planning § 1 et seq.

Protest or petition by property owners, validity and construction of provisions of zoning statute or ordinance respecting, 4 ALR2d 335.

Applicability of zoning regulations to governmental projects or activities, 61 ALR2d 970.

Judgment denying permit for use of premises under zoning regulations as bar to subsequent application, 71 ALR2d 1362.

Authority of zoning commission to impose, as condition of allowance of special zoning exception, permit, or variance, requirements as to highway and traffic changes, 49 ALR3d 492.

Standing of municipal corporation or other governmental body to attack zoning of land lying outside its borders, 49 ALR3d 1126.

Zoning board's grant of new application for zoning change, variance, or special exception after denial of previous application covering same property or part thereof, 52 ALR3d 494.

Regulations creating and placing “floating zones,” 80 ALR3d 95.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting off-premises advertising structures, 81 ALR3d 486.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting the erection or maintenance of advertising structures within a specified distance of street or highway, 81 ALR3d 564.

Application of zoning regulation to radio or television facilities, 81 ALR3d 1086.

Validity of zoning for senior citizen communities, 83 ALR3d 1084.

Zoning regulations as applied to homes or housing for the elderly, 83 ALR3d 1103.

Applicability of zoning regulation to nongovernmental lessee of government-owned property, 84 ALR3d 1187.

Applicability of zoning regulations to projects of nongovernmental public utility as affected by utility's having power of eminent domain, 87 ALR3d 1265.

What constitutes accessory or incidental use of religious or educational property within zoning ordinance, 11 ALR4th 1084.

Local use zoning of wetlands or flood plain as taking without compensation, 19 ALR4th 756.

Express or implied restriction on lessee's use of residential property for business purposes, 46 ALR4th 496.

Zoning: what constitutes “incidental” or “accessory” use of property zoned, and primarily used, for residential purposes, 54 ALR4th 1034.

Zoning: what constitutes “incidental” or “accessory” use of property zoned, and primarily used, for business or commercial purposes, 60 ALR4th 907.

Addition of another activity to existing nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 61 ALR4th 724.

Change in volume, intensity or means of performing nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 61 ALR4th 806.

Change in type of activity of nonconforming use as violation of zoning ordinance, 61 ALR4th 902.

Zoning regulation of intoxicating liquor as pre-empted by state law, 65 ALR4th 555.

Zoning: residential off-street parking requirements, 71 ALR4th 529.

Laches as defense in suit by governmental entity to enjoin zoning violation, 73 ALR4th 870.

Validity of zoning laws setting minimum lot size requirements, 1 ALR5th 622.

Construction and application of zoning laws setting minimum lot size requirements, 2 ALR5th 553.

Applicability of zoning regulations to governmental projects or activities, 53 ALR5th 1.

101A C.J.S. Zoning and Land Planning § 1 et seq.